Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.080

Scope of requirements of this chapter.

The information and communications functions of the legislature and legislative agencies are subject to the requirements of this chapter, and the standards, policies, and procedures established under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 61 s 8.]